Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1

General Provisions

54-1-101 — 54-1-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 54-1-101 — 54-1-104 (Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 6; 1919, ch. 149, §§ 1, 5; 1923, ch. 7, § 34; Shan. Supp., §§ 1720a7b1, 1720a7b5, 1720a7b53, 373a86, 1720a29b22; Code 1932, §§ 309, 3171, 3174, 3211; Acts 1957, ch. 335, § 1; 1959, ch. 325, § 1; 1972, chs. 526, 829, § 7; 1973, ch. 140, § 2; 1974, ch. 419, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 54-101, 54-102, 54-111, 54-112), concerning the bureau of highways (now department of transportation) and its director (now commissioner), were repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 1. For new law, see §§ 4-3-104, 4-3-113, and 4-3-2303.

54-1-105. Duties of commissioner.

The commissioner of transportation shall have charge of all records of the department of transportation, shall keep a book of records of all proceedings and orders pertaining to the business of the department, and shall keep on file copies of all plans, specifications, and estimates prepared by the department.

The commissioner shall:

Cause to be made and kept blueprints and maps showing a general highway plan of the state; the plan to consist of the main traveled roads that will, when improved, show and provide a connected system of improved highways throughout the state;

Collect information and statistics with reference to the mileage, character, and condition of highways and bridges in the counties;

Investigate and determine the method of road construction best adapted to the various sections; and

Establish standards for the construction and maintenance of highways in the counties, giving due regard to topography, natural conditions, availability of road material, prevailing traffic conditions, and ways and means of the counties to meet their portion of the cost of building and maintaining roads under this chapter and chapters 2 and 5 of this title.

The commissioner may at all times be consulted by the county and district officers having authority over highways and bridges and, in like manner, call on the county and district officials for information relative to highways and bridges within their county or district, in order to determine the character and have the general supervision of the construction, repair and maintenance of all roads improved under this chapter and chapters 2 and 5 of this title.

Acts 1919, ch. 149, § 6; impl. am. Acts 1923, ch. 7, §§ 1, 2, 33; Shan. Supp., § 1720a7b6; Code 1932, § 3175; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-113; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cross-References. Duties of commissioner, § 4-3-2303.

54-1-106 — 54-1-114. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 54-1-106 — 54-1-114 (Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 3; 1919, ch. 149, §§ 3, 4, 14; 1923, ch. 7, § 35; Shan., §§ 1720a29b7-1720a29b11; Shan. Supp., §§ 373a87, 1720a7b3, 1720a7b4, 1720a7b14, 1720a7b42-1720a7b46; Code 1932, §§ 310, 3172, 3173, 3183, 3200-3204; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3201; Acts 1961, ch. 207, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 54-103, 54-105 — 54-110, 54-114, 54-115), concerning highway bureau (now department of transportation) assistants, engineers, expenses, and depository of records, were repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 1. For new law, see §§ 4-3-104, 4-3-113, and 4-3-2303.

54-1-115. Status of highway projects — Reports to general assembly.

The department shall furnish to each member of the general assembly on a quarterly basis, beginning March 1, 1970, a report on the status of highway projects in the county or counties that the member represents.

The report shall include, but not be limited to:

A list of road locations and times scheduled for construction within the county or counties;

A status report on the roads under construction, and their scheduled completion date, including notation of any delays or speedups and reasons for delays or speedups;

Any changes in previously announced plans for highways;

Any highway projects under consideration, which report will be furnished only upon request;

Notification of all public hearings on proposed highways; and

Any additional information that the department feels would be helpful to a member of the general assembly becoming better informed on the operation of the department in the area the member represents.

Acts 1970, ch. 485, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-130; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, § 3-1-114.

54-1-116, 54-1-117. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 54-1-116 and 54-1-117 (Acts 1917, ch. 74, § 9; Shan., §§ 1720a29b39-1720a29b42; Shan. Supp., §§ 1720a7b70-1720a7b73; Acts 1929 (E.S.), ch. 33, § 1; Code 1932, § 3233; Acts 1951, ch. 47, § 1; 1976, ch. 614, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 54-116, 54-123), concerning reports of completed projects and cooperation with highway departments of other states, were repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 1. For new law, see §§ 4-3-104, 4-3-113, 4-3-2303.

54-1-118. Contracting with University of Tennessee.

The commissioner is authorized and empowered to enter into a contract or contracts with the University of Tennessee regarding:

The development and testing of new materials to be used in constructing and maintaining roads, bridges and highways;

The development of more economical methods of designing, constructing and maintaining roads, bridges and highways; and

The training of personnel in the fundamentals of highway engineering.

Acts 1951, ch. 127, § 1 (Williams, § 3175.1); impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 3; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-124; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12.

54-1-119. Design-build contracts.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the department may award contracts using a design-build procedure in accordance with this section.

As used in this section, “design-build contract” means an agreement that may include, but is not limited to, design, right-of-way acquisition, or utility relocation, or all of those, along with the construction of a project by a single entity.

Selection criteria for a design-build contract shall include the cost of the project and may include design-build firm qualifications, time of completion, innovation, design and construction quality, design innovation, or other technical or quality related criteria, as determined by the department.

The department is authorized to award a stipulated fee to design-build firms that submit responsive proposals but are not awarded the design-build contract. The department shall not be required to award a stipulated fee, but if it elects to award the fee, the amount of the stipend and the terms under which stipends are to be paid shall be stated in the request for proposals.

The department's authority to use design-build contracting procedures as provided in this section shall be subject to the following limitations:

The department may initiate up to fifteen (15) design-build contracts in any one (1) fiscal year, if the contract has a total estimated contract amount of less than one million dollars ($1,000,000);

The department may not initiate more than five (5) design-build contracts in any one (1) fiscal year, if the contract has a total estimated contract amount in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000); and

If the proposed design-build contract has a total estimated contract amount in excess of seventy million dollars ($70,000,000), the department shall specifically identify the project as a proposed design-build project in the transportation improvement program submitted annually to the general assembly in support of the commissioner's annual funding recommendations.

The department shall prepare a report on the effectiveness of design-build contracts and submit it to the chairs of the transportation and safety committee of the senate and transportation committee of the house of representatives upon the completion of three (3) design-build contracts that have a total contract amount in excess of one million dollars ($1,000,000).

The department may establish agency policy, or the department may promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, or both, in furtherance of this part.

Acts 2007, ch 274 § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 90.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-1-119 (Acts 1951, ch. 127, § 2 (Williams, § 3175.2); 1957, ch. 77, § 1; 1961, ch. 221, § 1; 1970, ch. 401, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 54-125), concerning expenditures authorized for testing new materials or developing methods for designing, constructing and maintaining roads, bridges and highways, was repealed by Acts 1985, ch. 156, § 1.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “the chairs of the transportation and safety committee of the senate and transportation committee of the house of representatives” for “the chairs of the transportation committees of the senate and house of representatives” in the middle of (e).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 236, § 94. April 19, 2013.

54-1-120 — 54-1-123. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former §§ 54-1-120 — 54-1-123 (Acts 1929, ch. 102, §§ 1-4; Code 1932, §§ 3238-3241; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 54-126 — 54-129), concerning the acquisition of realty and erection of structures, were repealed by Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 1. For present provisions, see §§ 4-3-2303, title 4, ch. 15, 12-1-106 — 12-1-108.

54-1-124. Funds for contracts with disadvantaged business concerns or enterprises.

As used in this section, “disadvantaged business concern or enterprise” includes, but is not limited to, a business concern or enterprise that is solely owned, or at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the assets or outstanding stock of which is owned, by an individual who personally manages and controls the daily operations of the business concern or enterprise and who is impeded from normal entry into the economic mainstream because of:

A disability as defined in § 4-26-102; or

Past practices of racial discrimination against African-Americans.

The commissioner of transportation is authorized to set aside an amount not to exceed ten percent (10%) of certain funds appropriated by congress for use by the department of transportation to contract with disadvantaged business concerns or enterprises.

This section shall be automatically repealed upon the expiration of the federal law appropriating the funds.

Acts 1984, ch. 737, §§ 1, 2; 1987, ch. 277, § 1; 1993, ch. 488, § 5; 1994, ch. 767, § 3; 1994, ch. 981, § 3.

Cross-References. Enhanced policymaking role for minority business, § 4-3-2305.

54-1-125. [Repealed.]

Acts 1990, ch. 1061, §§ 1-3; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 23, effective July 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 54-1-125 concerned the wildflower preservation and propagation pilot project.

54-1-126. Responsibility for maintenance of public roads, streets, highways or bridges.

The department of transportation is responsible for the maintenance of only those public roads, streets, highways or bridges and similar structures that are designated by the department as being on the state system of highways or the state system of interstate highways.

The department shall enter into a written contract with each city, county, or metropolitan government before undertaking any work or providing any funds for work with respect to public roads, streets, highways or bridges and similar structures within their boundaries, other than those designated by the department as being on the state system of highways or the state interstate system of highways. These contracts shall include a provision that the city, county or metropolitan government is solely responsible for all maintenance of the completed work. The contract shall not be valid in the absence of the maintenance provision.

The department of transportation is responsible for maintenance of public roads and bridges within the boundaries of parks, as defined by § 11-3-101, administered by the department of environment and conservation, as follows:

Maintenance work undertaken by the department of transportation shall be limited to the following items as necessary to maintain the roadway:

Resurfacing and repair of the travel lanes and shoulders;

Repair and cleaning of drainage structures;

Repair of bridges and abutments;

Repair of retaining walls and tunnels; and

Replacement or repair of traffic control devices installed in accordance with the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices, including regulatory and warning signs and pavement markings;

Maintenance of the public roadway rights-of-way, including mowing and litter removal, as well as maintenance of golf cart paths, greenways, trails, parking lots, driveways, restricted access service roads, and any similar facilities shall remain the responsibility of the department of environment and conservation. The department of transportation may perform any of this maintenance work on behalf of the department of environment and conservation in accordance with an interagency agreement; provided, that the agreement shall require the department of transportation to be reimbursed for the cost of performing the work;

In coordination with the department of environment and conservation, the department of transportation shall develop and maintain an inventory of public roads and bridges within each state park that are eligible for maintenance by the department of transportation under this subsection (c) and shall develop a program to prioritize maintenance needs. The department may enter into a written agreement with the department of environment and conservation related to such maintenance work;

The department of transportation is authorized to use state highway funds, established in chapter 2, part 1 of this title, to fund the maintenance work authorized in this subsection (c), in accordance with normal budget procedures; and

The department of transportation may enter into agreements with the counties or municipalities in which the state park is located to perform maintenance work on public roads within state parks, and the department may use state highway funds to reimburse the counties or municipalities for the costs of performing such maintenance work.

Acts 1991, ch. 133, §§ 1, 2; 2017, ch. 425, § 1.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 425, § 5. July 1, 2017.

Cross-References. Negligence concerning planning, construction and maintenance of public roads, bridges, etc. in state highway systems, § 9-8-307.

Attorney General Opinions. Neither the Department of Transportation nor any other agency of state or local government has express authority to grant a citizen permission to erect a cross or similar memorial upon a right-of-way of a state or interstate highway, but the Department does have authority to remove and dispose of crosses and similar memorials, that have been erected or placed upon the right-of-way of a state or interstate highway, OAG 05-016 (2/03/05).

54-1-127. Installation of natural gas line via bridge attachment.

The commissioner of transportation has the authority to approve, for economic development purposes, installation of a natural gas line via bridge attachment.

Acts 1992, ch. 897, § 2.

54-1-128. Borrow excavations — Exemption of certain road work construction from local and regional zoning and planning regulations.

For purposes of this section, “borrow material” or “borrow excavation” is as defined in the Tennessee department of transportation, bureau of highways, standard specifications for road and bridge construction, March 1981, as amended.

No local or regional zoning and planning regulations regarding the area from which borrow material is obtained shall apply to road work construction projects for construction work performed under a contract entered into with the state; provided, that the borrow pit from which the material is obtained:

Is temporary, and the use of the pit does not exceed the completion date of the state project;

Meets all storm water runoff requirements;

Meets the requirements of the federal Clean Water Act and the federal Water Pollution Control Act, compiled in 33 U.S.C. § 1251, et seq.;

Has a reclamation plan approved by the municipality or county in which the project is located; provided, that if a proposed reclamation plan is not approved within thirty (30) days after it is filed with the appropriate county or municipal officer by the operator of the borrow excavation, then the operator may begin work pending plan approval;

Is not located on a street or road currently operating below level of service “C,” or is located on a street or road that would be reduced below level of service “C” by traffic generated by the borrow site operation; and

In all other ways meets the requirements of the state contract governing the section of road where the borrow material is to be used.

The borrow material shall not be used for any other purpose.

Local governments may require surety that affected streets and roads will be restored to their original condition.

Reclamation of the borrow pit shall be completed before final acceptance of the project.

Acts 1993, ch. 79, § 1; 1994, ch. 714, § 1.

54-1-129. Informational signs.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, it is the duty of the department of transportation to erect and maintain informational signs at sites and facilities that serve the educational, historical and cultural interests of the citizens of the state, including the erection and maintenance of the signs along the various highways of Tennessee for radio stations that regularly broadcast public service information regarding weather conditions, travel and road conditions and/or tourism-related sites and facilities in their respective areas. In order to be eligible for the highway signage, radio stations shall demonstrate that no less than one fourth (¼) of their total broadcast programming consists of public service information regarding weather conditions, travel and road conditions and/or tourism-related sites and facilities in their respective areas, and that the public service information is broadcast regularly at intervals of no greater than thirty (30) minutes during the period of time the radio station is on the air.

The department shall promulgate rules and regulations, within the specific parameters of subsection (a), to establish eligibility standards for the erection of highway signs for radio stations broadcasting public service information.

Erection of the informational signs shall be within the guidelines prescribed by the Manual on Uniform Traffic Control Devices.

This section shall become operative only if the federal highway administrator advises the commissioner of transportation in writing that this section shall not render Tennessee in violation of federal laws and regulations and subject to penalties prescribed in the federal laws and regulations.

Acts 1995, ch. 108, §§ 1-4.

54-1-130. Allowable overhead, costs and rates for design and consultant contracts.

In order to promote engineering and design quality and to ensure the maximum benefits of competition by professional engineering and design service firms, the commissioner of transportation is authorized to establish cost principles to be used to determine the reasonableness and allowability of various costs, including overhead rates, salary limits, allowable expense reimbursements and other costs the commissioner may deem necessary to regulate as they are applicable to design and consultant contracts. The overhead rates for professional engineering and design service firms shall not exceed one hundred forty-five percent (145%) of the consultant's direct labor costs. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require competitive bidding of design and consultant contracts.

Acts 1996, ch. 1002, § 1.

54-1-131. Web page.

The department of transportation shall develop and maintain a web page on the world wide web of the Internet. The web page shall include:

Construction locations on all interstate highways maintained by the department; and

A map, updated weekly, of construction locations and areas of possible delay.

The department is authorized to include additional information on the web page as deemed necessary by the department to provide and promote safe and efficient use of the state system of highways and the state system of interstate highways.

Acts 1999, ch. 318, § 1.

54-1-132. Criminal history background checks for applicants — Authorization.

The commissioner is authorized to seek criminal history background checks pursuant to § 38-6-109 for applicants for the job classes of highway response operator 1 and 2 and highway response supervisor 1 and 2. The commissioner is further authorized to require the applicants to provide fingerprint samples to the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the federal bureau of investigation for the purpose of conducting a criminal history background check.

Acts 2002, ch. 739, § 1.

54-1-133. Funding for signing and marking memorial highways and bridges.

The department, subject to appropriation by the general assembly, shall fund from resources in the highway fund the cost of signage and marking of an interstate, United States highway, or state highway designated as a memorial highway or memorial bridge for any of the following individuals killed in the line of duty:

A member of the military, including the reserves and national guard; or

Any state or local public safety official, including, but not limited to, members of the highway patrol, county law enforcement officials, local police officers, firefighters, whether paid or volunteer, and emergency medical personnel.

The department of transportation, subject to appropriation by the general assembly, shall fund from resources in the highway fund the cost of signage and markers installed on a conventional state highway under the DUI memorial signing program pursuant to § 54-5-1003.

Acts 2002, ch. 790, § 5; 2013, ch. 308, § 1; 2016, ch. 1039, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. This section was originally enacted as § 54-1-132. It was redesignated as this section, due to multiple enactments at § 54-1-132.

The provisions of Acts 2002, ch. 792, § 5, concerning funding for signing and marking memorial highways, appear to conflict with the provisions of Acts 2002, ch. 790, § 5 codified here.

Acts 2016, ch. 1039, § 1 provided that the act, which amended this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Tyler Head Law”.

Acts 2016, ch. 1039, § 4 provided that the department of transportation is urged to install as soon as reasonably practicable a memorial sign pursuant to this act to honor the memory of Tyler Head, the namesake of this act and twenty-year old college student, who tragically passed away at the scene of a violent head-on collision on February 3, 2012, in which the other driver had been under the influence of alcohol; provided, that all of the requirements of this act have been met.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment inserted “, subject to appropriation by the general assembly,” in the introductory paragraph.

The 2016 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 46. July 1, 2013.

Acts 2016, ch. 1039, § 5. July 1, 2016.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. § 54-1-133 does not constitute a standing general appropriation of funds for the cost of signage and marking of an interstate, U.S. highway, or state highway designated as a memorial highway or memorial bridge for a member of the military or a public safety official killed in the line of duty, OAG 04-093 (5/18/04).

54-1-134. Vandalism of state highway structures.

As used in this subsection (a), “state highway structure” includes any state highway facility; building; bridge; overpass; tunnel; barricade; fence; wall; traffic control device; right-of-way; sign or marker of any nature whatsoever erected upon or maintained within or adjacent to a state highway or the state highway right-of-way by any authorized source or under the authority of the department; and letters or figures of any nature whatsoever on any sign, marker, barricade or fence.

It is an offense for any person who is not authorized to construct or repair a state highway structure to knowingly carve upon, write, paint or otherwise mark upon, deface, rearrange, or alter any state highway structure.

It is an offense for any person who is not authorized to construct or repair a state highway structure to knowingly, in any manner, destroy, damage, knock down, mutilate, mar, steal or remove any state highway structure.

A violation of subdivision (a)(2) or (a)(3) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Whenever any state highway structure described in this subsection (a) is damaged knowingly or negligently by any person, firm or corporation, the person, firm or corporation shall be liable for the damage to the state highway structure, to be recovered by a civil action in the name of the state. The civil action shall be instituted by the attorney general and reporter, whose duty it shall be to represent the state in the action.

Any person who reports information to a law enforcement officer that leads to the apprehension and conviction of a person for a violation of this section shall receive a reward of two hundred fifty dollars ($250). The county where the conviction occurs shall provide the reward money from the proceeds of the fines collected under this section.

The proceeds from the fines imposed for violations of this section shall be collected by the respective court clerks and then deposited in a dedicated county fund. The fund shall not revert to the county general fund at the end of a fiscal year but shall remain for the vandalism enforcement rewards established in subdivision (b)(1).

Each county shall expend the funds generated by the fines provided for in this section by appropriation for the vandalism enforcement rewards. Excess funds, if any, may be expended for litter control programs on adoption of an appropriate resolution by the county legislative body.

Acts 2004, ch. 514, § 1; 2013, ch. 472, § 1.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (a) which read: “(a)(1) It is an offense for any person who is not authorized to construct or repair a highway structure to knowingly carve upon, write, paint or otherwise mark upon, or in any manner destroy, mutilate, deface, mar, steal or remove any highway bridge, overpass, tunnel, fence, wall, traffic control device, sign or other public highway structure or building.“(2) A violation of subdivision (a)(1) is a Class A misdemeanor.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2013, ch. 472, § 5. July 1, 2013.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class A misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

54-1-135. Transportation system failure.

In the event of a transportation system failure, an imminent threat of a failure, or other emergency that the commissioner reasonably believes would present a hazard to the traveling public or a significant delay in transportation, then the commissioner shall have the authority to enter into contracts narrowly tailored to remedy the actual or imminent failure or other emergency by one of the following methods:

When conditions allow, bids will be taken at a special letting. The commissioner is authorized to waive any provisions of this title related to bidding to effectuate this special letting including advertisement, time periods and notice; or

If the commissioner determines that the failure, threatened failure, or other emergency requires immediate attention, then the commissioner may enter into a contract through noncompetitive selection of a prequalified contractor available to undertake the repairs immediately.

In the event the commissioner enters into a contract under this section, the commissioner shall provide immediate written notice to the commissioner of finance and administration and to the comptroller. Within thirty (30) days of the commissioner entering into a contract under this section, copies of all bids and supporting documentation shall be filed with the fiscal review committee.

Acts 2004, ch. 603, § 1.

54-1-136. Biofuels and the implementation of incentives to encourage the production of biofuels.

The department of transportation is authorized to undertake public-private partnerships with transportation fuel providers, including, but not limited to, farmer co-ops, to install a network of refueling facilities, including storage tanks and fuel pumps, dedicated to dispensing biofuels, including, but not limited to, ethanol (E85) and biodiesel (B20).

To accomplish the purposes of this section, the department may establish a grant program to render financial assistance to help pay the capital costs of purchasing, preparing, and installing fuel storage tanks and fuel pumps for biofuels at private sector fuel stations. The department may apply for, and make reasonable efforts to secure, federal assistance and other funding sources for the grant program. The department may attempt to maximize the total investment in biofuel refueling facilities.

For the purpose of establishing biofuel storage tanks and fuel pumps at private sector fuel stations, the department shall use any federally-appropriated funds or the general assembly may appropriate the funds to the department from sources other than the state highway fund.

The Tennessee department of agriculture shall have the authority to inspect and test biofuels under the Kerosene and Motor Fuels Quality Inspection Act of 1989, compiled in title 47, chapter 18, part 13.

The department of agriculture is authorized to develop and implement an alternative fuel research program to stimulate public and private research into both the technology of converting Tennessee agriculture products, including, but not limited to, soybeans, switchgrass and other biomass, into alternative fuels and the production capabilities needed to deliver alternative fuels to Tennessee consumers.

No expenditure of public funds, pursuant to this section, shall be made in violation of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

The department may also develop and implement a program to encourage all political subdivisions of the state and public colleges and universities to increase the number of vehicles that use alternative fuels in the fleets of all political subdivisions, colleges, or universities.

Acts 2005, ch. 370, §§ 1–5; 2007, ch. 456, § 1.

Cross-References. Petroleum products and alternative fuels tax law, title 67, ch. 3.